District of Columbia statutes.
47-2002.03

Tax on gross receipts for transient lodgings or accommodations; food or drink for immediate consumption; spirits sold for consumption on premises; rental vehicles — Collection of tax and transfer to Washington Convention and Sports Authority.

(a)

The Mayor shall collect and deposit in a lockbox maintained by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia the tax imposed pursuant to § 47-2002.02 as agent on behalf of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority (“Authority”) and shall transfer the revenue from the tax upon receipt to the Washington Convention Center Fund established pursuant to § 10-1202.08.

(b)

The Mayor shall develop and apply a fixed formula to the taxes imposed pursuant to §§ 47-2002 and 47-2002.02 to determine the amount that shall be transferred to the Authority.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 112, ch. 146, title I, § 125b
as added Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 302(b), 41 DCR 5333
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 59(g), 45 DCR 745
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(e), 45 DCR 4826
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 33(v), 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(o)(2)(B), 57 DCR 181

History

Washington Convention Center Authority, audit of accounts and operations, certification of sufficiency of sum of projected revenues, see § 10-1203.05.
Washington Convention Center Authority, collection and transfer of taxes to Fund, see § 10-1203.07.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 10-1203.05 and § 10-1203.07.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 47-2002.3.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-213, in the section heading, validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 18-111, in the section heading, substituted “Washington Convention and Sports Authority” for “Washington Convention Center Authority”; and, in subsec. (a), substituted “Washington Convention and Sports Authority (‘Authority’)” for “Washington Convention Center Authority” and substituted “Washington Convention Center Fund” for “Washington Convention Center Authority Fund”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(o)(2)(B) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(o)(2)(B) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2002.02.

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2002.02.

Expiration of §§ 301, 302, and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: Section 2(l)(1) of D.C. Law 12-142 provided that § 306(a) of D.C. Law 10-188, providing for the expiration of that act, is repealed. Section 2(l)(2) of D.C. Law 12-142 provided that the subsection shall apply as of February 27, 1997.

Editor's Notes